Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE B. EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 774. LOCAL PROVISION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES

Sec. 774.001. MUTUAL ASSISTANCE AMONG MUNICIPALITIES AND COUNTIES IN PROVIDING EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES. (a) On request, a county shall provide emergency medical services for a municipality within that county or for a county bordering that county if:

(1) an agreement has been executed between the county and the requesting municipality or county;

(2) an emergency exists in the requesting municipality or county;

(3) the requesting municipality or county is temporarily unable to provide its own emergency medical services;

(4) the request is for services that the county receiving the request provides or contracts to provide for persons within its jurisdiction; and

(5) the county providing the services will be able to provide reasonable protection to persons within its jurisdiction while providing services for the requesting municipality or county.

(b) On request, a municipality shall provide emergency medical services for the county in which that municipality is located or for a municipality located within 30 miles of that municipality if:

(1) an agreement has been executed between the municipality and the requesting municipality or county;

(2) an emergency exists in the requesting municipality or county;

(3) the requesting municipality or county is temporarily unable to provide its own emergency medical services;

(4) the request is for services that the municipality receiving the request provides or contracts to provide for persons within its jurisdiction; and

(5) the municipality providing the services will be able to provide reasonable protection to persons within its jurisdiction while providing services for the requesting municipality or county.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 774.002. EDUCATIONAL INCENTIVE PAY FOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIANS. (a) A municipality or other political subdivision that employs emergency medical technicians may pay educational incentive pay to employees holding certificates from the Department of State Health Services as emergency medical technicians.

(b) The educational incentive pay is in addition to any other form of compensation provided by law for emergency medical technicians.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1573, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 774.003. EMERGENCY AMBULANCE SERVICE PROVIDED BY COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may provide for emergency ambulance service in the county, including the provision of necessary equipment, personnel, and maintenance for the service.

(b) In providing for the services authorized by Subsection (a), a commissioners court may enter into exclusive agreements with any municipality, hospital district, sheriff's office, fire department, private ambulance service, or other agency or entity that the commissioners court finds to be suitably organized to provide efficient emergency ambulance service in the county. The governing body of a municipality or hospital district in which emergency ambulance service is to be rendered must approve an agreement made with the commissioners court to provide that service in the municipality or hospital district.

(c) A commissioners court operating under this section may expend county funds to defray the expense of establishing, operating, and maintaining the emergency ambulance service in the county. The funds may be expended whether the service is provided directly by the county or by agreement with some other governmental agency or private entity.

(d) A commissioners court providing emergency ambulance service under this section shall establish reasonable fees for the service. The commissioners court or any other agency or entity performing the service may charge and collect the fees.

(e) A commissioners court may make special provisions for rendering emergency ambulance service to indigent persons.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 915, Sec. 20, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 774.004. MUNICIPAL POLICE OFFICER RESPONSE ACCOMPANYING MUNICIPAL AMBULANCE RESPONSE OUTSIDE MUNICIPALITY. (a) This section applies to an agreement between two municipalities under Section 774.001(b) or between a county and a municipality under Section 774.001(b) or 774.003.

(b) The agreement may authorize police officers employed by the responding municipality to secure the scene of an emergency, accident, fire, or disaster to which the municipality's emergency ambulance service responds under the agreement.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 479 (H.B. 233), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.